Hawaii statutes.
§514A-82.6
Pets, replacement of subsequent to prohibition. (a) Any apartment owner who keeps a pet in the
owner's apartment pursuant to a provision in the bylaws which allows owners to
keep pets or in the absence of any provision in the bylaws to the contrary may,
upon the death of the animal, replace the animal with another and continue to
do so for as long as the owner continues to reside in the owner's apartment or
another apartment subject to the same bylaws.

(b) Any
apartment owner who is keeping a pet pursuant to subsection (a) as of the
effective date of an amendment to the bylaws which prohibits owners from
keeping pets in their apartments shall not be subject to the prohibition but
shall be entitled to keep the pet and acquire new pets as provided in
subsection (a). [L 2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next